Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.560

Clean energy transition workforce account.

The clean energy transition workforce account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to support workers who are affected by the state's transition away from fossil fuels to a clean energy economy and associated program administrative expenses.

[ 2022 c 157 s 3.]